Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF MINNEAPOLIS; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials, supplies, fixtures, furniture, and equipment used in or incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, upgrade, repair, maintenance, or improvement of public infrastructure for the Upper Harbor Terminal Amphitheater in the city of Minneapolis are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A. To be eligible for the exemption, purchases must be made by a contractor, subcontractor, or the operator of the amphitheater, and must be made after June 30, 2025, and before January 1, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025, and before January 1, 2029. new text end